Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.10
Director; seal; adopt; rules and regulations; fiscal year.

The director shall, within thirty days after the creation of the Department of Veterans' Affairs, adopt a seal and make such rules and regulations for its administration, not inconsistent herewith, as he or she may deem expedient. He or she may, from time to time, amend such rules and regulations. The fiscal year of the department shall conform to the fiscal year of the state.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 11, p. 932;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 28.